Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Oregon Department of
Aviation, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 5,109,593
(2) Aircraft registration ................. $ 167,496
(3) Pavement maintenance ............. $ 2,289,138
(4) General aviation
entitlement
grant program........................... $ 457,288
(5) Aviation system
action program ......................... $ 9,305,361
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or  received by the Oregon Department of Aviation,
for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 1,986,590
(2) General aviation
entitlement
grant program........................... $ 4,115,592
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 5004 (HB 5004-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 23, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 2, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5004 (HB 5004-A) Page 2